Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 6 LOCAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS - COUNTIES
30-20-619. Issuing bonds - property specially benefited.

For the purpose of paying all or such portion of the cost of any improvement constructed or acquired under the provisions of this part 6 as may be assessed against the property specially benefited and not paid by the sales tax authorized by section 30-20-604.5 or by the county, special assessment bonds of the county may be issued, of such date, in such form, and on such terms, including, without limitation, provisions for their sale, payment, and redemption, as may be prescribed by the board, bearing the name of the street or district improved and payable in a sufficient period of years after such date to cover the period of payment provided, and in convenient denominations. All such bonds shall be issued upon estimates approved by the board, and the county treasurer shall preserve a record of the same in a suitable book kept for that purpose. All such bonds shall be subscribed by the chair of the board, countersigned by the county treasurer, with the county seal affixed, and attested by the county clerk and recorder; except that the county treasurer need not countersign a bond issued by a district formed for the purposes authorized in section 30-20-603 (11.5). Such bonds shall be payable out of the moneys collected on account of the assessments made for said improvements, from reserve accounts, if any, established to secure the payment of such bonds, and from any other legally available moneys. All moneys collected from such assessments for any improvement shall be applied to the payment of the bonds issued, until payment in full is made of all the bonds, both principal and interest, or to fund or replenish reserve accounts, if any, established to secure the payment of such bonds. The bonds may be sold, under such terms and conditions as are established by the board, in such amounts as will be sufficient to pay for the cost of the improvements.

Whenever three-fourths of the bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for an improvement constructed under this part 6 have been paid and canceled and for any reason any remaining assessments are not paid in time to pay the remaining bonds for the district and the interest due thereon, the county may pay, from legally available moneys, the bonds when due and the interest due thereon and may reimburse itself by collecting the unpaid assessments due the district.

When all bonds of an improvement district have been paid, any moneys remaining to the credit of such district may be transferred to a special surplus and deficiency fund, and whenever there is a deficiency in any improvement district bond fund to meet the payment of outstanding bonds for other improvement districts and interest due thereon, or to redeem such outstanding bonds in accordance with any estimated redemption schedule used in connection with the sale of such bonds, the deficiency may be paid from the moneys available therefor in the surplus and deficiency fund.

For the purpose of paying all or such portion of the costs of any improvement constructed pursuant to section 30-20-603 (1)(a) and (1)(c) to which the revenues from any sales tax imposed pursuant to section 30-20-604.5 have been pledged, revenue bonds may be issued, which shall be payable solely from such sales tax. Such bonds shall be issued on the terms set forth in section 29-2-112, C.R.S.

In connection with the issuance of bonds payable solely from special assessments as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the board may provide by resolution for the submission of the question of issuing such bonds to the electors eligible to vote on the question. In that case, the board may provide by resolution that all registered electors of the county shall be eligible to vote on the question or that only electors of the district shall be eligible to vote on the question.

In connection with the issuance of bonds payable from special assessments which are additionally secured as provided in subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this section, the board may provide by resolution for the submission of the question of issuing the bonds to all registered electors of the county.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 6, bonds issued in accordance with the requirements of this section may be payable from the assessments levied in one or more improvement districts.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 6, any district formed for the purpose of encouraging, accommodating, and financing improvements as authorized in section 30-20-603 (11.5) may be authorized to:

Issue one or more series of bonds, and bonds of any such district may be payable from the assessments levied pursuant to one or more assessment resolutions; and

Jointly finance the improvements of multiple such districts located in one or more counties by intergovernmental agreement of the organizing counties or through other legally available means. Such intergovernmental agreement may include provisions for, among other things, the transfer of revenues collected pursuant to this part 6, including assessment payments, penalty payments pursuant to section 30-20-615, and property sale proceeds pursuant to section 30-20-617, from the county treasurer of the county in which a property is located to the county treasurer for the county issuing bonds pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 489, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-18.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1245, § 2, effective March 22.

L. 85:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 1075, § 8, effective May 24.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 1060, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) added, p. 1214, § 8, effective May 7.

L. 94:

(5) and (6) added, p. 1190, § 85, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 518, § 15, effective April 30.

L. 2002:

(1) amended and (7) added, p. 270, § 9, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(1) and(2) amended and (8) added, p. 1298, § 19, effective May 27.

L. 2010:

(1) and (8) amended, (SB 10-100), ch. 207, p. 902, § 5, effective May 5.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-618 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-619.5. Issuing refunding bonds.

The board may issue one or more series of bonds to refund all or any portion of the outstanding bonds issued by one or more improvement districts pursuant to section 30-20-619. Any such bonds shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of article 56 of title 11, C.R.S. In such case, for purposes of complying with the requirements of article 56 of title 11, C.R.S., any bonds issued to refund all or any portion of the outstanding bonds of one or more improvement districts shall be deemed to be revenue bonds, the refunded bonds shall be deemed to be revenue obligations, and the assessments shall be deemed to be revenue.

Any bonds issued pursuant to this section may refund all or any portion of the outstanding bonds of one or more improvement districts and may be secured by a combination of assessments levied on all or a specifically identified portion of the assessed property located within such districts.

Two or more series of bonds may be issued to refund the outstanding bonds of one or more districts, and each series may be secured by assessments levied on different portions of the assessed property located within the districts that have outstanding bonds.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) or (6) of this section, in connection with the issuance of refunding bonds pursuant to this section, the board may amend the resolution imposing the assessment to modify all or any portion of the following terms describing the assessment as specified in the resolution:

The rate of interest the board charges on unpaid installments;

Any penalty for prepayment of an assessment;

The principal balance due and owing on the assessment;

The dates upon which unpaid assessments are due;

The number of years over which unpaid assessments are due; or

Any other term specified in the resolution as necessary to make the resolution conform to the requirements of this section.

Before the board may amend the resolution imposing the assessment to increase the amount of principal and interest due and owing under the assessment, the number of years over which unpaid assessments are due, or the amount of any unpaid assessments, the board shall:

Obtain consent in writing to the amendment to the resolution from the owner of each tract of land that would be affected by the amendment; or

Set a place and time, not less than twenty days nor more than forty days after the date of such setting, for a hearing on the proposed amendment.

Thereupon, the clerk of the board shall cause notice by publication to be made of the pendency of the proposed amendment, a summary of the terms of such amendment as described in subsection (4) of this section, and of the time and place of the hearing on the proposed amendment.

All complaints and objections made in writing concerning the proposed amendment by the owners of any property in the district shall be heard and determined by the board before final action is taken. If the owners of the tracts upon which more than one-half of the affected assessments, measured by the unpaid assessment balance, submit written protests to the amendment to the board on or before the date specified in the notice, the board shall not adopt the proposed amendment. Any proposed amendment may be modified, confirmed, or rescinded prior to passage of the resolution authorized under subsection (4) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order either to issue refunding bonds or to amend a resolution of the board imposing an assessment pursuant to this section, the board shall make written findings that:

The obligation of the county shall not be materially or adversely impaired with respect to any outstanding bond secured by the assessments; and

The principal balance of any assessment shall not increase to an amount such that the aggregate amount that is assessed against any one particular tract of land exceeds the maximum benefit to the tract that is estimated to result from the project that is financed by the assessment and refunding of the outstanding bonds.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 270, § 10, effective August 7.

30-20-620. Bonds negotiable - interest.

All bonds issued pursuant to section 30-20-619 (1) and (2) shall be negotiable in form and shall bear such interest as may be fixed by the board, not exceeding a maximum net effective interest rate specified by the board, prior to the use of said bonds in payment for improvements or the sale thereof.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 489, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-19.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1075, § 9, effective May 24.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1060, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1214, § 9, effective May 7.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-619 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-621. Manner of redemption. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

p. 489, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-20.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1075, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1057, § 23, effective May 24.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 278, § 22, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-620 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-622. Contracts for construction - bond - default.

Except as provided in this section, all local improvements made under the provisions of this part 6 shall be constructed by independent contract, and all contracts shall be let by the board. All such contracts shall be let to the lowest reliable and responsible bidder, after public advertisement once in a newspaper of general circulation in such county; except that after such advertisement, if it be determined by the board that the bids are too high or that the proposed improvement can be made by the county for less than the bid of the lowest reliable and responsible bidder, such county is empowered to provide for doing the work by hiring labor by the day or otherwise and to arrange for purchasing necessary material, all under the supervision of the board.

Except when the county does the work, no contract shall be made without a surety bond for its faithful performance, with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board. No surety shall be accepted or approved by the board other than a corporate surety company, unless he is the owner of real estate in this state, free and clear of all encumbrances, in double the amount of his liability on all bonds upon which he may then be surety. Upon default in the performance of any contract, the board may advertise and relet the remainder of the work in like manner, without further resolution, and deduct the cost from the original contract price or, with the approval of the board, advance any excess out of the funds of the county and recover the same by suit on the original bond. In all advertisements the right shall be reserved to reject any or all bids, and, upon rejecting all bids, if deemed advisable by the board, other bids may be advertised for.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section and the provisions of section 24-92-104 (3), C.R.S., all construction contracts for any improvements funded in whole or in part by the district sales tax authorized by section 30-20-604.5 or by revenue bonds issued pursuant to section 30-20-619 (4) shall be awarded by competitive sealed bidding pursuant to the procedures set forth in article 92 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 490, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-21.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 1076, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1061, § 35, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(3) added, p. 1215, § 10, effective May 7.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-621 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-623. Provisions to be inserted.

Every contract shall provide that it is subject to the provisions of the laws under which the county exists and of the resolution authorizing the improvement; that the aggregate payment thereon shall not exceed the amount appropriated; that, upon ten days' written notice to the contractor, the work under such contract, without cost or claim against the county, may be suspended for substantial cause; and that, upon complaint of any owner of land to be assessed for the improvement that the improvement is not being constructed in accordance with the contract, the board may consider the complaint and make such order in the premises as shall be just, and such order shall be final.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 490, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-22.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1076, § 12, effective May 24.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1061, § 36, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-622 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-624. Utility connections may be ordered before paving - costs - default.

Before paving in any district in pursuance of this part 6, the board may order the owners of property therein to connect their several premises with the gas, water, or sewer mains or with any other utility in the street in front of their several premises. Upon default of any owner for thirty days after such order to make such connections, the city or town may contract for and make the connections at such distance, under such regulations, and in accordance with such specifications as may be prescribed by the board. The whole cost of each connection shall be assessed against the property with which the connection is made, and the cost shall be paid upon the completion of the work and in one sum. The cost shall be assessed, shall become a lien, and shall be collected in the same manner as is provided in this part 6 for the assessment and collection of the cost of other special improvements. Upon default in the payment of any such assessment, the property shall be sold in like manner and with like effect.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 490, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-23.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1061, § 37, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-623 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-625. No action maintainable - exception - grounds - limitations.

No legal or equitable action shall be brought or maintained to enjoin the collection of assessments levied under this part 6 except upon the grounds:

That notice of a hearing upon the amount of the assessment was not given as required in this part 6, and any person presenting objections to the board at or before the hearing on assessment shall be deemed to have waived this ground;

That the hearing upon the amount of the assessment as provided in this part 6 was not held;

That the improvement ordered was not one authorized by this part 6.

No action shall be brought under paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section unless the objections on which such action is based have been presented to the board in writing prior to the hearing on the proposed improvements as provided in section 30-20-603 (6)(i). Any action brought with respect to the ordering of any improvements, the creation of any district, the authorization or issuance of any bonds, the levying of any assessments, or any other action taken under this part 6 shall be commenced within thirty days after the effective date of the resolution ordering the improvements, creating the district, authorizing or issuing bonds, or levying assessments or the performance of any other action complained of or else shall be thereafter perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 491, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-24.

L. 85:

(2) amended, p. 1076, § 13, effective May 24.

L. 86:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 1062, § 38, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-624 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-626. Requirements of publication of notice.

Notwithstanding any provisions of part 1 of article 70 of title 24, C.R.S., compliance with the requirements of publication of notice specified in this part 6 shall be deemed in full compliance for all purposes of this part 6.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 491, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-30-25.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 30-20-625 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

30-20-627. Local improvements completed - dissolution.

When the local improvements specified in the preliminary order referred to in section 30-20-603 (5) and specified in the resolution authorizing the improvements have been completed and any debt incurred or bonds issued have been paid, the board shall take all steps necessary to dissolve the district and, upon completion of such steps, shall declare, by resolution, that the district is dissolved; except that this requirement does not apply to a district formed for the purposes authorized in section 30-20-603 (11.5). Upon dissolution, any moneys remaining to the credit of such district that have not been transferred to a special surplus and deficiency fund as permitted in section 30-20-619 (3) may be used for any county purpose as determined by the board, including, without limitation, the reimbursement to the county of any county moneys spent to provide any portion of the costs of the local improvements completed within the dissolved district.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1215, § 11, effective May 7.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 272, § 11, effective August 7.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-100), ch. 207, p. 903, § 6, effective May 5.

30-20-628. County treasurer - policies and procedures.

The county treasurer may adopt policies and procedures which the county treasurer deems necessary and reasonable for the administration and collection of assessments imposed and payable pursuant to the provisions of this part 6 and which are consistent with the provisions of said part 6.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1472, § 4, effective October 1.